ru: Спортивные товары > Игры в помещении > Настольный теннис > Аксессуары для ракеток для настольного тенниса: Основания для ракеток для настольного тенниса; Чехлы для ракеток для настольного тенниса; Очистители для ракеток для настольного тенниса; Торцевая лента для ракеток для настольного тенниса; Обмотка ручки для ракеток для настольного тенниса; Накладки на ракетки для настольного тенниса; Клей для накладок на ракетки для настольного тенниса
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Jogos internos > Pingue-pongue > Acessórios para raquetes de pingue-pongue: Madeiras para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Estojos para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Limpadores de raquetes de pingue-pongue; Fitas de borda para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Fitas de aderência para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Folhas de borracha para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Colas e adesivos para borracha de pingue-pongue
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Jogos em interior > Pingue Pongue > Acessórios de raquetes de pingue-pongue: Lâminas para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Caixas de raquetes de pingue-pongue; Produtos de limpeza para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Fita de extremidade para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Fita de aderência para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Folhas de borracha para raquetes de pingue-pongue; Colas e adesivos para borrachas de pingue-pongue
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Các môn thi đấu trong nhà > Bóng bàn > Phụ kiện vợt bóng bàn: Cốt vợt bóng bàn; Túi đựng vợt bóng bàn; Dung dịch vệ sinh vợt bóng bàn; Băng dán viền vợt bóng bàn; Băng quấn cán vợt bóng bàn; Mặt mút vợt bóng bàn; Keo dán mút vợt bóng bàn
de: Sportartikel > Indoor - Aktivitäten > Tischtennis > Zubehör für Tischtennisschläger: Tischtennis-Hölzer; Tischtennisschlägerhüllen; Tischtennisschläger-Reiniger; Tischtennis-Kantenband; Tischtennis-Griffband; Tischtennisbeläge; Tischtenniskleber
ja: スポーツ用品 > 室内競技・室内ゲーム > 卓球 > 卓球ラケット関連用品: 卓球ラケット用ブレード; 卓球ラケットケース; 卓球ラケット用クリーナー; 卓球ラケット用エッジテープ; 卓球ラケット用グリップテープ; 卓球ラケット用ラバー; 卓球用ラバー接着剤
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Игри на закрито > Пинг-понг > Аксесоари за хилки за пинг-понг: Дървени плоскости за хилки за тенис на маса; Калъфи за пинг-понг хилки; Почистващи средства за хилки за тенис на маса; Лента за ръбове на хилка за тенис на маса; Лента за захват на хилка за тенис на маса; Гумени листове за хилка за тенис на маса; Лепила за гумички за тенис на маса
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Juegos de interior > Ping pong > Accesorios para paletas de ping pong: Maderas para paletas de ping pong; Fundas para palas de ping pong; Limpiadores para paletas de ping pong; Cintas para bordes de paletas de ping pong; Cintas de agarre para paletas de ping pong; Láminas de goma para paletas de ping pong; Adhesivos y pegamentos para gomas de ping pong
en: Sporting Goods > Indoor Games > Ping Pong > Ping Pong Paddle Accessories: Ping Pong Paddle Blades; Ping Pong Paddle Cases; Ping Pong Paddle Cleaners; Ping Pong Paddle Edge Tape; Ping Pong Paddle Grip Tape; Ping Pong Paddle Rubber Sheets; Ping Pong Rubber Glues & Adhesives
nb: Sportsutstyr > Innendørsspill > Bordtennis > Tilbehør til bordtennisracketer: Stammer for bordtennisracketer; Vesker til bordtennisracketer; Rengjøringsmidler for bordtennisracketer; Kantteip for bordtennisracketer; Grepsteip for bordtennisracketer; Bordtennisgummi; Gummilim og klebemidler for bordtennis
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Jocuri de interior > Ping-pong > Accesorii pentru palete de ping-pong: Lame pentru palete de ping-pong; Huse pentru palete de ping-pong; Produse de curățare pentru palete de ping-pong; Bandă de margine pentru palete de ping-pong; Bandă de aderență pentru paleta de ping-pong; Foi de cauciuc pentru palete de ping-pong; Adezivi și lipici pentru cauciucul paletei de ping-pong
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Igre u zatvorenom > Ping pong > Pribor za ping pong reket: Oštrice za ping pong reket; Torba za ping pong reket; Sredstva za čišćenje za ping pong reket; Traka za rub za ping pong reket; Traka za držanje reketa za ping pong; Gumene podloge za reket za ping pong; Gumena ljepila i ljepila za ping pong
sv: Sportartiklar > Inomhussporter > Bordtennis > Tillbehör till bordtennisracketar: Stommar för bordtennisracketar; Bordtennisracketfodral; Rengöring för bordtennisracketar; Kanttejp för bordtennisracketar; Grepptejp för bordtennisracketar; Gummin till bordtennisracketar; Gummilim och bindemedel för bordtennis
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室內運動 > 桌球 > 桌球拍配件: 桌球拍底板; 桌球拍護套; 桌球拍清潔劑; 桌球拍護邊帶; 桌球拍握把布; 桌球拍膠皮; 桌球膠皮黏著劑
it: Articoli sportivi > Giochi indoor > Ping pong > Accessori racchette ping pong: Telai per racchette da ping pong; Custodie per paddle da ping pong; Detergenti per racchette da ping pong; Nastro per bordi racchette da ping pong; Nastro per impugnatura racchette da ping pong; Fogli di gomma per racchette da ping pong; Colle e adesivi per gomme da ping pong
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > İç Mekan Sporları > Pinpon > Pinpon Raketi Aksesuarları: Masa tenisi raketi tahtaları; Pinpon Raketi Kılıfları; Masa tenisi raketi temizleyicileri; Masa tenisi raketi kenar bantları; Masa tenisi raketi grip bantları; Masa tenisi raketi lastikleri; Masa tenisi lastik yapıştırıcıları
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Kambario žaidimai > Stalo tenisas > Stalo teniso rakečių priedai: Ping Pong Paddle Blades; Stalo teniso rakečių dėklai; Stalo teniso raketės valikliai; Stalo teniso raketės kraštų juostelė; Stalo teniso rakečių sukibimo juosta; Stalo teniso rakečių gumos dangos; Ping gumos klijai ir lipniosios medžiagos
fr: Équipements sportifs > Jeux d’intérieur > Ping Pong > Accessoires de raquettes de ping pong: Bois de raquette de ping-pong; Étuis pour raquettes de ping pong; Nettoyants pour raquettes de ping-pong; Bandes de protection de raquette de ping-pong; Bandes de grip pour raquette de ping-pong; Revêtements pour raquettes de ping-pong; Colles et adhésifs pour revêtements de ping-pong
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Gry towarzyskie > Tenis stołowy > Akcesoria do rakietek do tenisa stołowego: Deski do rakietek do tenisa stołowego; Pokrowce na rakietki do tenisa stołowego; Środki do czyszczenia rakietek do tenisa stołowego; Taśmy brzegowe do rakietek do tenisa stołowego; Owijki do rakietek do tenisa stołowego; Okładziny do rakietek do ping-ponga; Kleje do okładzin do tenisa stołowego
hu: Sportszerek > Beltéri játékok > Asztalitenisz > Asztaliteniszütő-kiegészítők: Asztalitenisz-ütőfák; Asztaliteniszütő-tokok; Asztalitenisz-ütőtisztítók; Asztalitenisz-ütőélvédő szalagok; Asztalitenisz-ütő markolatszalagok; Pingpongütő-borítások; Asztalitenisz-ütőborítás ragasztók
da: Sportsartikler > Indendørsspil > Bordtennis > Bordtennisbat – tilbehør: Battræ til bordtennis; Bordtennisbatetuier; Rensemidler til bordtennisbat; Kanttape til bordtennisbat; Grebstape til bordtennisbat; Belægninger til bordtennisbat; Gummilim og klæbemidler til bordtennis
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Παιχνίδια εσωτερικού χώρου > Πινγκ πονγκ > Αξεσουάρ ρακετών πινγκ πονγκ: Ξύλα ρακετών πινγκ πονγκ; Θήκες ρακετών πινγκ πονγκ; Καθαριστικά ρακετών πινγκ πονγκ; Ταινίες άκρων ρακετών πινγκ πονγκ; Ταινίες λαβής ρακετών πινγκ πονγκ; Λάστιχα ρακέτας πινγκ πονγκ; Κόλλες για λάστιχα πινγκ πονγκ
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Interiérové hry > Stolný tenis > Príslušenstvo k pingpongovým raketám: Hlavy pingpongových rakiet; Puzdrá na pingpongové rakety; Čistiace prostriedky na pingpongové rakety; Páska na rukoväť pingpongovej rakety; Páska na rukoväť pingpongovej rakety; Gumové povrchy na stolnotenisové rakety; Lepidlá a adhezíva na stolnotenisové poťahy
ko: 스포츠용품 > 실내용 게임 > 탁구 > 탁구채 부대용품: 탁구 라켓 블레이드; 탁구채 케이스; 탁구 라켓 클리너; 탁구 라켓 엣지 테이프; 탁구 라켓 그립 테이프; 탁구 라켓 러버 시트; 탁구 러버 접착제
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Sisäpelit > Pingis > Pingismailatarvikkeet: Pöytätennismailojen rungot; Pingismailakotelot; Pöytätennismailojen puhdistusaineet; Pöytätennismailojen reunateipit; Pöytätennismailojen grippiteipit; Pöytätennismailan kumit; Pöytätennismailojen kumiliimat
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Igre v zaprtih prostorih > Namizni tenis > Dodatki za loparje za namizni tenis: Glave loparjev za namizni tenis; Etuiji za loparje za namizni tenis; Čistilniki za loparje za namizni tenis; Robni trak za loparje za namizni tenis; Oprijemalni trak za loparje za namizni tenis; Gumijaste plošče za loparje za namizni tenis; Lepilo za gumo za namizni tenis
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 室内游戏 > 乒乓球用品 > 乒乓球拍配件: 乒乓球拍底板; 乒乓球拍套; 乒乓球拍清洁剂; 乒乓球拍护边贴; 乒乓球拍吸汗带; 乒乓球拍胶皮; 乒乓球胶皮胶水与粘合剂
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > เกมในร่ม > ปิงปอง > อุปกรณ์ไม้ตีปิงปอง: ไม้เปล่าปิงปอง; เคสใส่ไม้ตีปิงปอง; น้ำยาทำความสะอาดไม้ปิงปอง; เทปติดขอบไม้ปิงปอง; เทปพันด้ามไม้ปิงปอง; แผ่นยางไม้ปิงปอง; กาวติดยางปิงปอง
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Indoorové aktivity > Ping pong > Pálky na stolní tenis – příslušenství: Dřeva pálek na stolní tenis; Pouzdra na pingpongovou pálku; Čističe pálek na stolní tenis; Ochranné pásky na hrany pálek na stolní tenis; Omotávky na pálky na stolní tenis; Gumové potahy na pálky na stolní tenis; Lepidla na potahy pálek na stolní tenis
nl: Sportartikelen > Binnenspelletjes > Pingpong > Accessoires voor pingpongbatjes: Pingpongbatjesframes; Dozen voor pingpongbatjes; Pingpongbatjesreinigers; Randtape voor pingpongbatjes; Griptape voor pingpongbatjes; Rubbers voor pingpongbatjes; Pingpongrubberlijmen en -kleefmiddelen